Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 29 Telephone Cooperatives
65-29-118. Dissolution.

A cooperative which has not commenced business may dissolve voluntarily by delivering to the secretary of state articles of dissolution, executed and acknowledged on behalf of the cooperative by a majority of the incorporators, which shall state:

The name of the cooperative;

The address of its principal office;

The date of its incorporation;

That the cooperative has not commenced business;

That the amount, if any, actually paid in, less any part thereof disbursed for necessary expenses of the cooperative, has been returned to those entitled thereto and that all easements shall have been released to the grantors;

That no debt of the cooperative remains unpaid; and

That a majority of the incorporators elect that the cooperative be dissolved. Such articles of dissolution shall be submitted to the secretary of state for filing as provided in this chapter.

A cooperative which has commenced business may dissolve voluntarily and wind up its affairs in the following manner:

The board of directors shall first recommend that the cooperative be dissolved voluntarily and thereafter the proposition that the cooperative be dissolved shall be submitted to the members of the cooperative at any annual or special meeting, the notice of which shall set forth such proposition. The proposed voluntary dissolution shall be deemed to be approved upon the affirmative vote of not less than a majority of all the members of the cooperative;

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, in any cooperative organized under this chapter which provides service in five (5) or more counties, including a county containing and physically divided by a United States government corps of engineers dam and reservoir project of thirty-four thousand (34,000) acres or more, and which serves less than twenty thousand (20,000) subscribers as of April 15, 1986, any election to voluntarily dissolve such cooperative shall be held on voting machines and under the supervision of the election commission. The voting machines for any such election shall remain open for nine (9) full hours from eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) until five o'clock p.m. (5:00 p.m.) Any election contest pursuant to this subdivision (b)(1)(B) shall be filed and tried by the criminal court of the county where the election occurs. The board of directors is hereby authorized to contract with any county election commission, or the employees thereof, affected by the terms of this subdivision (b)(1)(B) for the purpose of holding an election pursuant to this subdivision (b)(1)(B). Any election as to whether to voluntarily dissolve any such cooperative shall also be conducted at an annual or special meeting that is held on a Saturday. For any such election to be held on or after September 1, 2000, notice of such meeting shall be published once a week for two (2) successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in each county served by the cooperative at least three (3) weeks prior to the meeting at which the election will be conducted. The results of any such election shall be announced as immediately as possible after the voting machines close at five o'clock p.m. (5:00 p.m.);

Upon such approval, a certificate of election to dissolve, hereinafter designated the “certificate,” shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of the cooperative by its president or vice president, and its corporate seal shall be fixed thereto and attested by its secretary. The certificate shall state:

The name of the cooperative;

The address of its principal office;

The names and addresses of its directors; and

The total number of members of the cooperative and the number of members who voted for and against the voluntary dissolution of the cooperative.

The president or vice president executing the certificate shall also make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that there was compliance with this subsection (b). Such certificate and affidavit shall be submitted to the secretary of state for filing as provided in this chapter;

Upon the filing of the certificate and affidavit by the secretary of state, the cooperative shall cease to carry on its business except insofar as may be necessary for the winding up thereof, but its corporate existence shall continue until articles of dissolution have been filed by the secretary of state;

After the filing of the certificate and affidavit by the secretary of state, the board of directors shall immediately cause notice of the winding up proceedings to be mailed to each known creditor and claimant and to be published once a week for two (2) successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office of the cooperative is located;

The board of directors shall wind up and settle the affairs of the cooperative, collect sums owing to it, liquidate its property and assets, pay and discharge its debts, obligations and liabilities, other than those to patrons arising by reason of their patronage, and do all other things required to wind up its business, and after paying or discharging or adequately providing for the payment or discharge of all its debts, obligations and liabilities, other than those to patrons arising by reason of their patronage, shall distribute any remaining sums, first, to patrons holding unpaid equity certificates, second, to patrons for the pro rata return of all amounts standing to their credit by reason of their patronage, and third, to members for the pro rata repayment of membership fees. Any sums then remaining shall be distributed among its members and former members in proportion to their patronage;

When all debts, liabilities and obligations of the cooperative have been paid and discharged or adequate provision shall have been made therefor, and all of the remaining property and assets of the cooperative shall have been distributed to the members pursuant to this section, the board of directors shall authorize the execution of articles of dissolution which shall thereupon be executed and acknowledged on behalf of the cooperative by its president or vice president, and its corporate seal shall be affixed thereto and attested by its secretary. Such articles of dissolution shall recite in the caption that they are executed pursuant to this chapter and shall state:

The name of the cooperative;

The address of the principal office of the cooperative;

That the cooperative has heretofore delivered to the secretary of state a certificate of election to dissolve and the date on which the certificate was filed by the secretary of state in the records of the office of the secretary of state;

That all debts, obligations and liabilities of the cooperative have been paid and discharged or that adequate provision has been made for such payment or discharge;

That all the remaining property and assets of the cooperative have been distributed among the members in accordance with the provisions of this section; and

That there are no actions or suits pending against the cooperative.

The president or vice president executing the articles of dissolution shall also make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that there has been compliance with this subsection (b). Such articles of dissolution and affidavit, accompanied by proof of the publication required in this subsection (b), shall be submitted to the secretary of state for filing as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 18; T.C.A., § 65-2918; Acts 2000, ch. 575, § 1.

65-29-119. Filing of articles of incorporation, etc.

Articles of incorporation, amendment, consolidation, merger, conversion, or dissolution, as the case may be, when executed and acknowledged and accompanied by such affidavits as may be required by applicable provisions of this chapter, shall be presented to the secretary of state for filing in the records of the office of the secretary of state. If the secretary of state shall find that the articles presented conform to the requirements of this chapter, the secretary of state shall, upon the payment of the fees as in this chapter provided, file the articles so presented in the records of the office of the secretary of state and, upon such filing, the incorporation, amendment, consolidation, merger, conversion or dissolution provided for therein shall be in effect. The secretary of state immediately upon the filing in the office of the secretary of state of any articles pursuant to this chapter shall transmit a certified copy thereof to the county clerk of the county in which the principal office of each cooperative or corporation affected by such incorporation, amendment, consolidation, merger, conversion, or dissolution shall be located. The clerk of any county, upon receipt of any such certified copy, shall file and index the same in the records of the clerk's office, but the failure of the secretary of state or of a clerk of a county to comply with this section shall not invalidate such articles. This section shall also apply to certificates of election to dissolve and affidavits of compliance executed pursuant to § 65-29-118(b)(2).

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 19; T.C.A., § 65-2919.

65-29-120. Filing fees.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect for the filing of:

Articles of incorporation, twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

Articles of amendment, fifteen dollars ($15.00);

Articles of consolidation or merger, fifteen dollars ($15.00);

Articles of conversion, fifteen dollars ($15.00);

Certificate of election to dissolve, fifteen dollars ($15.00);

Articles of dissolution, fifteen dollars ($15.00); and

Certificate of change of principal office, five dollars ($5.00).

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 28; T.C.A., § 65-2920.

65-29-121. Use of revenue.

Revenues of a corporation for any fiscal year may be used to:

Defray expenses of the cooperative and of the operation and maintenance of its facilities during such fiscal year;

Pay the interest and principal obligations of the cooperative coming due in such fiscal year;

Finance, or to provide a reserve for the financing of, the construction or acquisition by, the cooperative of additional facilities to the extent determined by the board of directors;

Provide a reasonable reserve for working capital;

Provide a reserve for the payment of indebtedness of the cooperative maturing more than one (1) year after the date of issuance of such indebtedness in an amount not less than the total of the interest and principal payments in respect thereof required to be made during the next following fiscal year;

Provide a fund for education and the dissemination of information concerning the effective use of telephone service and other services made available by the cooperative; and

Provide reserves against the contingencies of catastrophe or calamity, including, but not limited to, ice breaks, cyclone, tornado, high winds, snows, etc.; reserves for bad debt losses, major service losses, such as discontinuance of service by large plants or government installations with a large number of telephones.

All operating revenues in excess of the amounts necessary to pay expenses of operating and maintenance of its facilities and interest during the fiscal year shall be distributed by the cooperative to its patrons as either:

A refund to the patrons, which refund may in the discretion of the governing body be:

A credit on the books of the cooperative as a capital credit;

In cash; or

A combination of subdivisions (b)(1)(A) and (B); or

A general rate reduction.

The amount of each individual patron's credit as in subdivision (b)(1) shall be the same percentage of the total funds available for credit to patrons as such patron contributed to the total patronage of the cooperative for the period involved.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 20; 1973, ch. 157, § 2; T.C.A., § 65-2921.

65-29-122. Disposition of property — Authorized sources of indebtedness.

A cooperative may not sell, mortgage, lease, or otherwise dispose of or encumber all or any major portion of its property unless such sale, mortgage, lease, or other disposition or encumbrance is authorized at a duly held meeting of the members thereof by the affirmative vote of not less than two thirds (2/3) of all of the members of the cooperative, and unless the notice of such proposed sale, mortgage, lease, or other disposition or encumbrance shall have been contained in the notice of the meeting; provided, that notwithstanding anything herein contained, or any other law, the board of directors of a cooperative, without authorization by the members thereof, shall have full power and authority to authorize the execution and delivery of a mortgage or mortgages or deed or deeds of trust upon, or the pledging or encumbrancing of, any or all of the property, or assets of the cooperative, tangible or intangible, whether acquired or to be acquired, and wherever situated, as well as the revenues and income therefrom, all upon such terms and conditions as the board of directors shall determine, to secure any indebtedness of the cooperative to the United States or any instrumentality or agency thereof, which shall include but shall not be limited to the rural electrification administration and/or the rural telephone bank.

A cooperative may secure any of its indebtedness through:

The Rural Telephone Finance Corporation;

Any savings and loan association or savings bank, collectively referred to as savings institutions, or any bank chartered by this state;

Any national bank or federal savings institution that has its main office located in this state; or

Any national or state bank, or any federal or state savings institution that has its main office located outside this state and that maintains one (1) or more branches in this state which are authorized to accept federally insured deposits. For the purposes of this section, an automated teller machine or such other similar type receptacle or device shall not be considered a branch.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), only a cooperative having territorial boundaries solely within the northwestern counties of this state having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand four hundred (32,400) nor more than thirty-two thousand five hundred (32,500), not less than thirty-seven thousand two hundred (37,200) nor more than thirty-seven thousand three hundred (37,300), and not less than forty-eight thousand one hundred twenty-five (48,125) nor more than forty-eight thousand two hundred (48,200), all according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and having seven thousand (7,000) or fewer members subscribing to telephone services, may sell, merge, mortgage, lease, or otherwise dispose of or encumber all or any major portion of its property, so long as such sale, mortgage, lease, or other disposition or encumbrance is authorized at a duly held meeting of the members of the cooperative by the affirmative vote of not less than two thirds (2/3) of the members voting on the disposition or encumbrance at such meeting, and so long as the notice of such proposed sale, merger, mortgage, lease, or other disposition or encumbrance is contained in the notice of the meeting. The provisions established by this subsection (c) may only be utilized by a Tennessee cooperative described within this subsection (c) and are not applicable to any other Tennessee cooperative.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 21; 1973, ch. 157, § 3; T.C.A., § 65-2922; Acts 1999, ch. 307, § 2; 2006, ch. 514, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

65-29-123. Nonliability of members for debts of cooperative.

The private property of the members of a cooperative shall be exempt from execution for the debts of the cooperative, and no member shall be liable or responsible for any debts of the cooperative.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 22; T.C.A., § 65-2923.

65-29-124. Mortgages.

Any mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument executed by a cooperative or foreign corporation transacting business in this state pursuant to this chapter, which, by its terms, creates a lien upon real and personal property then owned or after-acquired, and which is recorded as a mortgage of real property in any county in which such property is located or is to be located, shall have the same force and effect as if the mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument were also recorded or filed in the proper office in such county as a mortgage of personal property. Recordation of any such mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument shall cause the lien thereof to attach to all after-acquired property of the mortgagor of the nature therein described as being mortgaged or pledged thereby immediately upon the acquisition of such property by the mortgagor, and such lien shall be superior to all claims of creditors of the mortgagor and purchasers of such property and to all other liens, except liens of prior record and tax liens, affecting such property.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 23; T.C.A., § 65-2924.

65-29-125. Exercise of eminent domain.

No property which is owned or held for public use, nor any interest therein, shall be condemned pursuant to the authority granted in § 65-29-104 if in the judgment of the court the condemnation of such property or interest therein will obstruct, prevent, burden, interfere with, or unduly inconvenience the continued use of such property for the public use of which it is devoted at the time the same is sought to be condemned. Where title to any property sought to be condemned is defective, it shall be passed by decree of court. Where condemnation proceedings become necessary, the court in which such proceedings are filed shall, upon application by the cooperative and upon the posting of a bond with the clerk of the court in such amount as the court may deem commensurate with the value of the property, order that the right of possession shall issue immediately or as soon and upon such terms as the court, in its discretion, may deem proper and just. In cases where condemnation of property already devoted to a public use is sought, no order as to right of possession shall issue until it is finally determined that the condemnor is entitled to condemn such property.

If such cooperative or company has actually taken possession of land, occupying it for the purpose of internal improvement, without condemnation or without the consent of the owner, the owner of such land may petition for a jury of inquest, in which case the same proceedings may be had, as near as may be, as set out in title 29, chapter 16, or amendments thereto; or the owner may sue for damages in the ordinary way, in which case the jury shall lay off the land in metes and bounds and assess the damages, as upon the trial of an appeal from the return of a jury of inquest.

The owner of land shall, in such cases, commence proceedings within twelve (12) months after the land has been actually taken possession of, and the work of the proposed internal improvement begun; saving, however, to unknown owners and nonresidents, twelve (12) months after actual knowledge of such occupation, not exceeding three (3) years, and saving to persons under the disabilities of infancy and unsoundness of mind, twelve (12) months after such disability is removed, but not exceeding ten (10) years.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 24; T.C.A., § 65-2925; Acts 2014, ch. 927, § 14.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 7.

65-29-126. Waiver of notice.

Whenever any notice is required to be given under this chapter or under the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a cooperative, waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time fixed for the giving of such notice, shall be deemed equivalent to such notice. If a person entitled to notice of a meeting shall attend such meeting, such attendance shall constitute a waiver of notice of the meeting, except in case the attendance is for the express purpose of objecting to the transaction of any business because the meeting shall not have been lawfully called or convened.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 25; T.C.A., § 65-2926.

65-29-127. Acknowledgments by officers, directors or members.

No person who is authorized to take acknowledgments under the laws of this state shall be disqualified from taking acknowledgments of instruments executed in favor of a cooperative or to which it is a party, by reason of being an officer, director, or member of such cooperative.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 26; T.C.A., § 65-2927.

65-29-128. Foreign corporations.

Any corporation organized on a nonprofit or a cooperative basis for the purpose of supplying telephone service and owning or operating telephone service lines in a state adjacent to this state shall be permitted to construct or acquire extensions of such lines and to transact business in this state without complying with any statute of this state pertaining to the qualification of foreign corporations for the transaction of business in this state. Any such foreign corporation, as a prerequisite to the construction or operation of such extension of its lines into and the transaction of business in this state, shall, by an instrument executed and acknowledged in its behalf by its president or vice president under its corporate seal attested by its secretary, designate the secretary of state its agent to accept service of process in its behalf. In the event any process shall be served upon the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall forthwith forward the same by registered mail to such corporation at the address thereof specified in such instrument. After such designation, such corporation may sue and be sued in the courts of this state and shall have all the rights, powers, privileges and immunities of a cooperative.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 27; T.C.A., § 65-2928.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

65-29-129. No exemption from ad valorem taxes.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exempt cooperatives and foreign corporations furnishing telephone service in this state pursuant to this chapter from ad valorem property taxes. Assessment schedules for such property shall be filed with the comptroller of the treasury. Cooperatives and foreign corporations shall also be subject to the sales and use tax under title 67, chapter 6. The payment of the above taxes shall be in lieu of all other taxes unless it is otherwise specifically provided by law.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 29; T.C.A., § 65-2929; Acts 1989, ch. 312, § 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 38.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 312, § 13 provided that the amendment by that act applies to all sales or uses of telecommunication services on or after June 1, 1989.

65-29-130. Jurisdiction of Tennessee public utility commission.

Cooperatives and foreign corporations engaged in rendering telephone service in this state pursuant to this chapter fall within the jurisdiction of the Tennessee public utility commission for the sole and specific purposes as set out below:

The establishment of territorial boundaries;

The hearing and determining of disputes arising between one (1) telephone cooperative and other telephone cooperatives, and between telephone cooperatives and any other type of person, corporation, association, or partnership rendering telephone service, relative to and concerning territorial disputes; and

The approval of sales and purchases of operating telephone properties.

Cooperatives and foreign corporations engaged in rendering telephone service in this state pursuant to this chapter fall within the jurisdiction of the comptroller of the treasury for the sole and specific purpose of assessing the cooperative property for ad valorem taxes as provided in § 65-29-129.

Either party shall have the right of appeal from any ruling, order or action by the commission or the comptroller of the treasury under the procedures established by §§ 4-5-322 and 4-5-323.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 30; T.C.A., § 65-2930; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 39; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 61, 62.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority”; and in (c), substituted “commission” for “authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-29-131. Securities act exemption.

Title 48, chapter 16 shall not apply to any note, bond, or other evidence of indebtedness issued by any cooperative or foreign corporation transacting business in this state pursuant to this chapter to the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or to any mortgage or deed of trust executed to secure the same. Title 48, chapter 16, as amended, shall not apply to the issuance of membership certificates or equity certificates by any cooperative or any such foreign corporation.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 31; T.C.A., § 65-2931.

65-29-132. Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be construed liberally. The enumeration of any object, purpose, power, manner, method, or thing shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manners, methods, or things.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 32; T.C.A., § 65-2932.

65-29-133. Cooperative elections — Criminal penalties.

It is a Class C misdemeanor in such cooperative elections to:

Commit any act prohibited in title 2, chapter 19, part 1;

Prepare more ballots than the number of accounts or eligible members of the cooperative holding the election;

Violate the rules or bylaws of the cooperative relative to voting; or

Otherwise engage in any fraudulent conduct in conducting such elections.

Any action under this section shall be brought in the criminal court of the county in which the election is conducted, as, notwithstanding title 2, chapter 17, shall any action challenging an action under § 65-29-109, relative to the filling of an office specified in § 65-29-111.

Acts 1985, ch. 316, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

65-29-134. Notice to cooperative members of merger.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, in any cooperative organized under this chapter which provides service in five (5) or more counties, including a county containing and physically divided by a United States government corps of engineers dam and reservoir project of thirty-four thousand (34,000) acres or more, and which serves less than twenty thousand (20,000) subscribers as of April 15, 1986, the board of directors of such cooperative must give notice to members of the cooperative that at the next annual or special meeting such board of directors is filing a stock merger registration statement with the securities and exchange commission or is taking other lawful measures to convert to or merge with a for-profit entity. Such notice to the members shall be published once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in each county served by the cooperative with the last notice being at least three (3) weeks prior to the meeting. Such notice of meeting shall be at least one fourth (¼) of a page in size and include an estimate of the moneys the board would expend to effectuate the merger.

The members shall then vote as to whether such stock merger registration statement may be filed or whether the board may take other appropriate measures to convert to or merge with a for-profit entity. In order for a membership approval to be valid, at least ten percent (10%) of the membership of the cooperative must vote and a majority of the voting members must vote in favor of submitting a registration statement or other valid measure to convert to or merge with a for-profit entity.

If the majority approves such filing or approves taking further appropriate action toward converting to or merging with a for-profit entity, then the board may make the appropriate registration statement filing with the securities and exchange commission or, in cases where a filing is unnecessary, may take further appropriate action.

Once such filing is made effective by the securities and exchange commission or such further appropriate action was taken, then the proposition for the conversion with or merger of a cooperative with a private corporation or other for-profit entity, and the proposed articles of conversion or merger approved by the board of directors of the parties to the proposed conversion or merger, shall then be submitted to a vote of the members of such cooperative at any annual or special meeting thereof, the notice of which shall set forth full particulars concerning the proposed conversion or merger including an estimate of the moneys expended to effectuate the conversion or merger. The notice of such meeting shall also be published once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in each county served by the cooperative with the last notice being at least three (3) weeks prior to the meeting. Such notice of meeting shall be at least one fourth (¼) of a page in size. The notice of the scheduled vote shall also be mailed in the members' monthly telephone bill one (1) month prior to the election.

Any election to convert or merge such cooperative shall be held at least ninety (90) days after the date the election at which the membership approved the filing of a registration statement or other appropriate measure for conversion or merger is held and shall be held on voting machines and under the supervision of the election commission in the county where the principal office of the cooperative is located. The voting machines for any such election shall remain open for nine (9) full hours from eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) until five o'clock p.m. (5:00 p.m.). Any election contest pursuant to this subsection (a) shall be filed and tried by the criminal court of the county where the election occurs. The board of directors is hereby authorized to contract with any county election commission, or the employees thereof, affected by the terms of this subsection (a) for the purpose of holding an election pursuant to this subsection (a). Any election as to whether to convert to or merge with a private corporation or other for-profit entity shall also be conducted at an annual or special meeting that is held on a Saturday. The proposed conversion or merger and the proposed articles of conversion or merger shall be deemed to be approved upon the affirmative vote of not less than two thirds (2/3) of those members of the cooperative voting thereon at such meeting.

This section shall not be construed as prohibiting the membership of a cooperative from amending the cooperative's bylaws to have more restrictive voting requirements to convert or merge into a for-profit entity than provided for under this section.

Acts 2000, ch. 695, §§ 1, 2.